Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.04.535

Washington award for vocational excellence—Granted annually—Notice—Presentation.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

Except for the 2018-19, 2019-20, and 2020-21 school years, the Washington award for vocational excellence shall be granted annually. It is the intent of the legislature to continue the policy of not granting the Washington award for vocational excellence in the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years. The workforce training and education coordinating board shall notify the students receiving the award, their vocational instructors, local chambers of commerce, the legislators of their respective districts, and the governor, after final selections have been made. The workforce training and education coordinating board, in conjunction with the governor's office, shall prepare appropriate certificates to be presented to the selected students. Awards shall be presented in public ceremonies at times and places determined by the workforce training and education coordinating board in cooperation with the office of the governor.

[ 2019 c 415 s 955; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 960; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 948; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 964; 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 930; 1995 1st sp.s. c 7 s 4; 1984 c 267 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 415: See note following RCW 28B.20.476.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 1: See note following RCW 43.41.455.

Effective dates—2015 3rd sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 28B.15.069.

Effective dates—2013 2nd sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Effective dates—2011 1st sp.s. c 50: See note following RCW 15.76.115.

Severability—1995 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 28C.04.520.